Utah statutes.
78B-14-615.   Jurisdiction to modify child-support order of foreign country or political subdivision.

(1)  If a foreign country or political subdivision that is a state will not or may not modify its order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child-support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether or not the consent to modification of a child-support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to Section 78B-14-611 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country or political subdivision.

(2)  An order issued pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

